Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF27.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1229YH (2) 91 jm/jh H.F. 27 Section 1. Section 422.7, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 45. a. As used in this subsection, 3 ânonpublic schoolâ and âpublic schoolâ mean the same as defined 4 in section 280.2. 5 b. Subtract the amount paid by the taxpayer to purchase a 6 nonathletic school uniform required to be worn by a student at 7 a nonpublic school or public school, not to exceed five hundred 8 dollars. 9 Sec. 2. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 10 retroactively to January 1, 2025, for tax years beginning on 11 or after that date. 12